Utah statutes.
17B-1-901.   A single bill for multiple commodities, services, or facilities
-- Suspending service to a delinquent customer.
(1)  If a local district provides more than one commodity, service, or
facility, the district may bill for the fees and charges for all commodities,
services, and facilities in a single bill.
(2)  A local district may suspend furnishing a commodity, service, or facility
to a customer if the customer fails to pay all fees and charges when due.
